Alaska, session 34, SB268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 23.10.066 is amended to read: 05 Sec. 23.10.066. Minimum paid sick leave benefit. Except as provided in (b) 06 of this section, employers [EMPLOYERS] in the state are required to provide their 07 employees paid sick leave as follows: 08 (1) employers with 15 or more employees shall allow employees to 09 accrue a minimum of one hour of paid sick leave for every 30 hours worked, but 10 employees are not entitled to accrue or use more than 56 hours of paid sick leave per 11 year, unless their employer sets a higher limit; 12 (2) employers with fewer than 15 employees shall allow employees to 13 accrue a minimum of one hour of paid sick leave for every 30 hours worked, but 14 employees are not entitled to accrue or use more than 40 hours of paid sick leave per 01 year, unless their employer sets a higher limit; 02 (3) employees who are exempt from overtime requirements under 29 03 U.S.C. 213(a)(1) shall be assumed to work 40 hours in each work week for purposes 04 of paid sick leave accrual unless their normal work week is less than 40 hours, in 05 which case paid sick leave accrues based on [UPON] that normal work week; 06 (4) paid sick leave shall carry over to the following year, but an 07 employer is not required to allow an employee to use more than the applicable 08 amounts of paid sick leave described in (1) and (2) of this section per year; 09 (5) paid sick leave as provided in this section shall begin to accrue at 10 the commencement of employment or July 1, 2025, whichever is later; an employee 11 shall be entitled to use paid sick leave as it is accrued; 12 (6) any employer with a paid leave or paid time off policy, who makes 13 available an amount of paid leave sufficient to meet the requirements of this section 14 that may be used for the same purposes and under the same conditions as paid sick 15 leave under this section, is not required to provide additional paid sick leave; 16 (7) an employee who is transferred to a separate entity or location, but 17 remains employed by the same employer, is entitled to all paid sick leave accrued at 18 the prior entity or location; when there is a separation from employment, but the 19 employee is rehired within six months of separation by the same employer, previously 20 accrued and unused paid sick leave shall be immediately reinstated; when a different 21 employer succeeds or takes the place of an existing employer, all employees of the 22 original employer who remain employed by the successor employer are entitled to all 23 accrued and unused paid sick leave. 24 * Sec. 2. AS 23.10.066 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 25 (b) Employers of seafood processing workers shall allow seafood processing 26 workers to accrue a minimum of 12 hours of paid sick leave on the first day of each 27 calendar month, but seafood processing workers are not entitled to 28 (1) use paid sick leave for the first 30 days of employment; 29 (2) use more than 12 hours of paid sick leave each month; or 30 (3) use or accrue more than 48 hours of paid sick leave each year, 31 unless the seafood processing worker's employer sets a higher limit. 01 (c) In this section, "seafood processing worker" means an employee who is 02 hired to perform work involving heading, gutting, separating, filleting, canning, or 03 other activities intended to prepare seafood for market. 04 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.